Idaho, session 2025, H0354.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-208, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-208. RULES PERTAINING TO MARKET VALUE -- DUTY OF ASSESSORS. (1) It
shall be the duty of the state tax commission to prepare and distribute to
each county assessor and the county commissioners within the state of Idaho
rules prescribing and directing the manner in which market value for assess-
ment purposes is to be determined for the purpose of taxation. The rules pro-
mulgated by the state tax commission shall require each assessor to find mar-
ket value for assessment purposes of all property, except that expressly ex-
empt under chapter 6, title 63, Idaho Code, within his county according to
recognized appraisal methods and techniques as set forth by the state tax
commission; provided, that the actual and functional use shall be a major
consideration when determining market value for assessment purposes. The
recognized appraisal methods shall, at a minimum, require the assessment of
such property to reflect, within reasonable statistical certainty, the me-
dian ratio of assessed value to market value for the categories of property
being tested within a range of ninety percent (90%) to one hundred ten per-
cent (110%) of such median ratio, using statistical methods such as confi-
dence intervals to determine compliance and requiring corrective actions if
the ratio falls outside of this range.
(2) To maximize uniformity and equity in assessment of different cat-
egories of property, such rules shall, to the extent practical, require the
use of reproduction or replacement cost less depreciation as opposed to his-
toric cost less depreciation whenever cost is considered as a single or one
(1) of several factors in establishing the market value of depreciable prop-
erty. The state tax commission shall also prepare and distribute amendments
and changes to the rules as shall be necessary in order to carry out the in-
tent and purposes of this title. The rules shall be in the form as the commis-
sion shall direct, and shall be made available upon request to other public
officers and the general public in reasonable quantities without charge. In
ascertaining the market value for assessment purposes of any item of prop-
erty, the assessor of each county shall, and is required to, abide by, adhere
to and conform with rules promulgated by the state tax commission.


(3) When establishing the real property market value for assessment
purposes of income-producing property, the assessor may use one (1) or more
market valuation methods, provided that the market value shall not include
contract rent related to the real estate only and shall exclude any value
of exempt intangible personal property as provided in section 63-602L,
Idaho Code. Upon request by the property owner, the assessor shall provide
the property owner with the assessor's calculations used to derive the in-
come-producing property owner's market value, including any value exempted
by statute.
SECTION 2. That Section 63-511, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-511. APPEALS FROM COUNTY BOARD OF EQUALIZATION. (1) Any time within
thirty (30) days after mailing of notice of a decision of the board of equal-
ization, or pronouncement of a decision announced at a hearing, an appeal of
any act, order or proceeding of the board of equalization, or the failure of
the board of equalization to act may be taken to the board of tax appeals.
Such appeal may only be filed by the property owner, the assessor, the state
tax commission or by a person aggrieved when he deems such action illegal or
prejudicial to the public interest. Nothing in this section shall be con-
strued so as to suspend the payment of property taxes pending said appeal.
(2) Notice of such appeal stating the grounds therefor shall be filed
with the county auditor, who shall forthwith transmit to the board of tax ap-
peals a copy of said notice, together with a certified copy of the minutes
of the proceedings of the board of equalization resulting in such act, or-
der or proceeding, or a certificate to be furnished by the clerk of the board
that said board of equalization has failed to act in the time required by
law on any complaint, protest, objection, application or petition in regard
to assessment of the complainant's property, or a petition of the state tax
commission. The county auditor shall also forthwith transmit all evidence
taken in connection with the matter appealed. The county auditor shall sub-
mit all such appeals to the board of tax appeals within thirty (30) days of
being notified of the appeal. The board of tax appeals may receive further
evidence and will hear the appeal as provided in chapter 38, title 63, Idaho
Code.
(3) Any appeal that may be taken to the board of tax appeals may, during
the same time period, be taken to the district court for the county in which
the property is located.
(4) In any appeal taken to the board of tax appeals or the district court
pursuant to this section, the burden of proof shall fall upon the party seek-
ing affirmative relief to establish that the valuation from which the appeal
is taken is erroneous, or that the board of equalization erred in its deci-
sion regarding a claim that certain property is exempt from taxation, the
value thereof, or any other relief sought before the board of equalization;
provided, however, that the burden of proof shall fall upon the party seek-
ing an increase in taxable value if the increase in value exceeds ten percent
(10%) of the value from the previous year, and the increase was due in part
to an assessment of the taxable value that resulted from the assessor failing
to use the equalization methods required pursuant to section 63-208, Idaho
Code. A preponderance of the evidence shall suffice to sustain the burden of


proof. The burden of proof shall fall upon the party seeking affirmative re-
lief and the The burden of going forward with the evidence shall shift as in
other civil litigation. The board of tax appeals or the district court shall
render its decision in writing, including therein a concise statement of the
facts found by the court and the conclusions of law reached by the court. The
board of tax appeals or the court may affirm, reverse, modify or remand any
order of the board of equalization, and shall grant other relief, invoke such
other remedies, and issue such orders in accordance with its decision, as ap-
propriate.
SECTION 3. That Section 63-602G, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-602G. PROPERTY EXEMPT FROM TAXATION -- HOMESTEAD. (1) For each tax
year, the first one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000) of the
market value for assessment purposes of the homestead as that term is defined
in section 63-701, Idaho Code, or fifty percent (50%) of the market value
for assessment purposes of the homestead as that term is defined in section
63-701, Idaho Code, whichever is the lesser, shall be exempt from property
taxation.
(2) The exemption allowed by this section may be granted only if:
(a) The homestead is owner-occupied and used as the primary dwelling
place of the owner. The homestead may consist of part of a multidwelling
or multipurpose building and shall include all of such dwelling or
building except any portion used exclusively for anything other than
the primary dwelling of the owner. The presence of an office in a home-
stead, which office is used for multiple purposes, including business
and personal use, shall not prevent the owner from claiming the exemp-
tion provided in this section; and
(b) The state tax commission has certified to the board of county com-
missioners that all properties in the county subject to appraisal by the
county assessor have, in fact, been appraised uniformly so as to secure
a just valuation for all property within the county; and
(c) The owner has certified to the county assessor that:
(i) He is making application for the exemption allowed by this
section;
(ii) The homestead is his primary dwelling place; and
(iii) He has not made application in any other county for the ex-
emption and has not made application for the exemption on any other
homestead in the county.
(d) For the purpose of this section, the definition of "owner" shall be
the same definition set forth in section 63-701(7), Idaho Code. When an
owner, pursuant to the provisions of section 63-701(7), Idaho Code, is
any person who is the beneficiary of a revocable or irrevocable trust,
or who is a partner of a limited partnership, a member of a limited lia-
bility company, or a shareholder of a corporation, he or she may provide
proof of the trust, limited partnership, limited liability company, or
corporation in the manner set forth in section 63-703(4), Idaho Code.
(e) Any owner may request in writing the return of all copies of any
documents submitted with the affidavit set forth in section 63-703(4),
Idaho Code, that are held by a county assessor, and the copies shall


be returned by the county assessor upon submission of the affidavit in
proper form.
(f) For the purpose of this section, the definition of "primary
dwelling place" shall be the same definition set forth in section
63-701(8), Idaho Code.
(g) For the purpose of this section, the definition of "occupied" shall
be the same definition set forth in section 63-701(6), Idaho Code.
(3) The county assessor of each county shall prescribe and make avail-
able forms to be used by a homeowner to apply for the homestead exemption pro-
vided in this section. The homeowner shall provide on such forms the home-
owner's full name, date of birth, complete address, and most recent previ-
ous complete address. The homeowner shall also provide, if applicable, such
homeowner's state-issued driver's license number or state-issued identifi-
cation card number.
(4) An owner need make application for the exemption described in sub-
section (1) of this section only once, as long as all of the following condi-
tions are met:
(a) The owner has received the exemption during the previous year as a
result of making a valid application as set forth in subsection (2)(c)
of this section.
(b) The owner or beneficiary, partner, member or shareholder, as appro-
priate, still occupies the same homestead for which the owner made ap-
plication.
(c) The homestead described in paragraph (b) of this subsection is
owner-occupied or occupied by a beneficiary, partner, member or share-
holder, as appropriate, and used as the primary dwelling place of the
owner or beneficiary, partner, member or shareholder, as appropriate.
(5)(a) The exemption allowed by this section shall be effective upon
on the date of the application eligibility status change provided on
the approved application for the current tax year and must be taken be-
fore the reduction in taxes provided by sections 63-701 through 63-710,
Idaho Code, is applied.
(b) If the eligibility status of the property eligible for the exemp-
tion changes during the tax year, the property taxes shall be prorated
based on the property's eligibility status during the year. The levy
rate shall be multiplied against the market value for assessment pur-
poses of the property, and the resulting tax due shall be divided by
three hundred sixty-five (365) days, or by three hundred sixty-six
(366) days if the tax year is a leap year, for the daily tax amount and
then multiplied by the number of days of the year such property has a
given exemption eligibility status. For an owner who qualifies for the
homeowner exemption, the property taxes shall be calculated using the
market value for assessment purposes, reduced by the exemption amount
provided in subsection (1) of this section. The levy rate shall be
multiplied against such value and divided by three hundred sixty-five
(365) days, or by three hundred sixty-six (366) days if the tax year is
a leap year, and then multiplied by the number of days such person is
eligible for the exemption.


(c) If the eligibility status of the property changes during the tax
year, the taxable value of the homestead or the tax amount shall be ad-
justed in one (1) of the following ways:
(i) If the property becomes eligible before the second Monday of
July, the reduced taxable value shall be entered on the property
roll pursuant to section 63-301, Idaho Code, and the homeowner
property tax relief roll pursuant to section 63-724(4), Idaho
Code;
(ii) If the property becomes eligible on or after the second Mon-
day of July, property taxes due shall be calculated as provided
in paragraph (b) of this subsection and any reduction in property
tax will result in a cancellation or refund as provided in section
63-1202, Idaho Code;
(iii) If the property becomes ineligible for the exemption before
the second Monday of July, any additional taxable value shall be
entered on the property roll pursuant to section 63-301, Idaho
Code, and the homeowner property tax relief roll pursuant to sec-
tion 63-724(4), Idaho Code;
(iv) If the property becomes ineligible for the exemption on or
after the second Monday of July but no later than the fourth Monday
of November, the additional value shall be assessed and entered on
the subsequent or missed property roll pursuant to the provisions
of section 63-301, Idaho Code; or
(v) If the property becomes ineligible for the exemption on or af-
ter the fourth Monday of November, the tax on the additional value
may be calculated as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection
and billed as provided for the recovery of the property tax exemp-
tion pursuant to this subsection.
(6) Recovery of property tax exemptions allowed by this section but im-
properly claimed or approved:
(a)(i) Prior to granting an exemption, the county assessor shall
investigate whether an applicant for the exemption has claimed the
exemption for another homestead and shall not grant the exemption
where it appears the exemption has been improperly claimed. The
applicant shall be notified of the county assessor's refusal to
grant the exemption.
(ii) Upon discovery of evidence, facts or circumstances indicat-
ing any exemption allowed by this section was improperly claimed
or approved, the county assessor shall decide whether the exemp-
tion claimed should have been allowed and, if not, notify the tax-
payer in writing, assess a recovery of property tax and notify the
county treasurer of this assessment. If the county assessor de-
termined that an exemption was improperly approved as a result of
county error, the county assessor shall present the discovered ev-
idence, facts or circumstances from the improperly approved ex-
emption to the board of county commissioners, at which time the
board may waive a recovery of the property tax and notify such tax-
payer in writing.
(iii) Upon the first instance of a taxpayer being discovered to
have claimed more than one (1) homestead exemption, the taxpayer


shall be subject to a penalty, payable to the county treasurer, in
an amount equal to the amount of property tax recovered pursuant
to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, which shall be paid in ad-
dition to such recovery amount. The taxpayer shall be notified of
the assessment of such penalty at the same time as the notice of the
assessor's refusal to grant the exemption in subparagraph (i) of
this paragraph.
(iv) Any subsequent violation within seven (7) years of an in-
stance pursuant to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph shall be a
misdemeanor, subject to the penalties provided in section 18-113,
Idaho Code. The county assessor shall notify the county prosecut-
ing attorney of any conduct that would constitute a misdemeanor
pursuant to this subparagraph.
(v) Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit a taxpayer from
claiming a homestead exemption after January 1 for a property that
is not already subject to the homestead exemption, provided any
claim for an exemption is consistent with the requirements of sub-
section (2)(c)(iii) of this section.
(b) Upon request by a county assessor conducting an investigation under
paragraph (a) of this subsection, or when information indicating that
an improper claim for the exemption allowed by this section is discov-
ered by the state tax commission, the state tax commission shall dis-
close relevant information to the appropriate county assessor, board
of county commissioners, county clerk, and county treasurer and to the
secretary of state. Information disclosed to county officials and the
secretary of state by the state tax commission under this subsection:
(i) May be used to decide the validity of any entitlement to the
exemption provided in this section;
(ii) Shall, as necessary, be used to determine a person's resi-
dence for voting purposes under title 34, Idaho Code; and
(iii) Is not otherwise subject to public disclosure pursuant to
chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.
(c) The assessment and collection of the recovery of property tax must
begin within the seven (7) year period beginning the date the assessment
notice reflecting the improperly claimed or approved exemption was re-
quired to be mailed to the taxpayer.
(d)(i) An applicant for an exemption under this section may appeal
to the county board of equalization the county assessor's refusal
to grant an exemption pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection
within thirty (30) days of the date the county assessor sent notice
of the refusal.
(ii) The taxpayer may appeal to the county board of equalization
the decision by the county assessor to assess the recovery of prop-
erty tax within thirty (30) days of the date the county assessor
sent the notice to the taxpayer pursuant to this section. The
board may waive the collection of all or part of any costs, late
charges, and interest in order to facilitate the collection of the
recovery of the property tax.
(iii) The taxpayer may appeal the imposition of the penalty pro-
vided in paragraph (a)(iii) of this subsection within thirty (30)


days of the date the county assessor sent the notice to the tax-
payer pursuant to this section.
(e) For purposes of calculating the tax, the amount of the recovered
property tax shall be for each year the exemption allowed by this sec-
tion was improperly claimed or approved, up to a maximum of seven (7)
years. The amount of the recovery of property tax shall be calculated
using the product of the amount of exempted value for each year multi-
plied by the levy for that year plus costs, late charges, and interest
for each year at the rates equal to those provided for delinquent prop-
erty taxes during that year.
(f) Any recovery of property tax shall be due and payable no later than
the date provided for property taxes in section 63-903, Idaho Code, and
if not timely paid, late charges and interest, beginning the first day
of January in the year following the year the county assessor sent the
notice to the taxpayer pursuant to this section, shall be calculated at
the current rate provided for property taxes.
(g) Recovered property taxes shall be billed, collected and dis-
tributed in the same manner as property taxes, except each taxing dis-
trict or unit shall be notified of the amount of any recovered property
taxes included in any distribution.
(h) Thirty (30) days after the taxpayer is notified, as provided in
paragraph (a) of this subsection, the assessor shall record a notice
of intent to attach a lien. Upon the payment in full of such recov-
ered property taxes prior to the attachment of the lien as provided in
paragraph (i) of this subsection, or upon the successful appeal by the
taxpayer, the county assessor shall record a rescission of the intent to
attach a lien within seven (7) business days of receiving such payment
or within seven (7) business days of the county board of equalization
decision granting the appeal. If the real property is sold to a bona
fide purchaser for value prior to the recording of the notice of the in-
tent to attach a lien, the county assessor and treasurer shall cease the
recovery of such unpaid recovered property tax.
(i) Any unpaid recovered property taxes shall become a lien on the real
property in the same manner as provided for property taxes in section
63-206, Idaho Code, except such lien shall attach as of the first day of
January in the year following the year the county assessor sent the no-
tice to the taxpayer pursuant to this section.
(j) For purposes of the limitation provided by section 63-802, Idaho
Code, moneys received pursuant to this subsection as recovery of prop-
erty tax shall be treated as property tax revenue.
(7) The legislature declares that this exemption is necessary and just.
(8) A homestead that previously qualified for exemption under this sec-
tion in the preceding year shall not lose such qualification due to: the
owner's, beneficiary's, partner's, member's or shareholder's absence in the
current year by reason of active military service or because the homestead
has been leased because the owner, beneficiary, partner, member or share-
holder is absent in the current year by reason of active military service.
An owner subject to the provisions of this subsection must apply for the ex-
emption with the county assessor every year on or before a deadline date as
specified by the county assessor for the county in which the homestead is


claimed. If an owner fails to apply on or before the established deadline,
the county may, at its discretion, discontinue the exemption for that year.
(9) A homestead that previously qualified for exemption under this
section in the preceding year shall not lose such qualification due to the
owner's, beneficiary's, partner's, member's or shareholder's death during
the year of the owner's, beneficiary's, partner's, member's or share-
holder's death and the tax year immediately following such death, provided
that the homestead continues to be a part of the owner's, beneficiary's,
partner's, member's or shareholder's estate. After such time, the new owner
shall reapply to receive the exemption pursuant to this section and shall
meet the qualification criteria contained in this section.
(10) The amount by which each exemption approved under this section ex-
ceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) may, in the discretion of the
governing board of a taxing district, be deducted from the new construction
roll for the following year prepared by the county assessor in accordance
with section 63-301A, Idaho Code, but only to the extent that the amount ex-
ceeds the same deduction made in the previous year.
(11) By July 1, 2023, the state tax commission shall establish a data-
base of all active exemptions claimed under this section, which database
shall be searchable by a person's name and by the address of the homestead
for which the exemption is claimed. The database shall be made accessible
to officials listed in subsection (6)(b) of this section for the purpose of
verifying that:
(a) Multiple active exemptions have not been claimed by the same per-
son; and
(b) A person's residence for voting purposes is the same as the home-
stead for which such person has an active exemption pursuant to this
section, if an exemption is so claimed.
(12) Increases in taxable value resulting from any change in status of
a property formerly or newly receiving the homeowner exemption shall be in-
cluded by the county assessor on the property roll or subsequent property
roll required pursuant to section 63-301, Idaho Code.
SECTION 4. That Section 63-903, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-903. WHEN PAYABLE. (1) All property taxes extended on the property
and operating property rolls shall be due and payable in full to the tax col-
lector without late charges and interest on or before December 20 of the year
in which the property taxes are levied. The property taxes may be paid in
full or paid in two (2) halves, the first half on or before December 20 with a
grace period extending to June 20 for the second half if the first half is to-
tally paid.
(2) Any portion of a property tax may be paid at any time, but nothing
in this section shall excuse costs, interest or late charges pursuant to sec-
tion 63-1002, Idaho Code.
(3) If the first one-half (1/2) is not totally paid on or before Decem-
ber 20, late charges as defined in section 63-201, Idaho Code, and interest
as provided in section 63-1001, Idaho Code, shall be assessed. If the first
one-half (1/2) of the property tax has been paid in part, late charges and in-
terest shall be calculated on the remaining first half tax due.


(4) If the second one-half (1/2) is not totally paid on or before June
20, late charges as defined in section 63-201, Idaho Code, and interest as
provided in section 63-1001, Idaho Code, shall be assessed. If the second
one-half (1/2) has been paid in part, late charges and interest shall be cal-
culated on the remaining property tax due.
(5) Property taxes on the subsequent or missed property roll shall be
billed within thirty (30) days after delivery of the property roll to the
county tax collector or as otherwise provided. The tax collector shall no-
tify the property owner of the property taxes due without delay after deliv-
ery of the property roll. The deadline for paying such property tax shall be
the same as provided in subsection (4) of this section. Delinquency occurs
if the tax remains unpaid thirty (30) days after the bills are mailed after
June 20. Late charges as defined in section 63-201, Idaho Code, and inter-
est as provided in section 63-1001, Idaho Code, shall be assessed in the same
manner as all other property taxes.
(6) All property taxes and fees, together with any costs, late charges
and interest collected by the county tax collector shall be remitted to the
county auditor as provided in section 63-1201, Idaho Code.
(7) Payment of any current property taxes shall not invalidate any pro-
ceeding in the collection of a delinquency.
SECTION 5. This act shall be in full force and effect on and after Jan-
uary 1, 2026.